Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201676-3109
Private transfer fee obligation;
how treated.

A
private transfer fee obligation recorded or entered into in this state on
or after March 11, 2011, does not run with the title to real property and
is not binding on or enforceable at law or in equity against any subsequent
owner, purchaser, mortgagee, or trustee of any interest in real property as
an equitable servitude or otherwise. Any private transfer fee obligation that
is recorded or entered into in this state on or after March 11, 2011, is void
and unenforceable. This section shall not be construed to mean that a private
transfer fee obligation recorded or entered into in this state before March
11, 2011, is presumed valid and enforceable.

Laws 2011, LB26, § 9.